Utah statutes.
39-6-49.   Limits of punishment.

Punishment directed by a military court for an offense may not exceed limits prescribed under Section 39-1-38.5 or lesser limits the governor may prescribe for the offense.



Amended by Chapter 15, 1989 General Session

